Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Chapter 83. Rights and Preferences of Veterans

§ 1541.
Repealed.
1965, No. 21, § 1, eff. July 1, 1967.

§ 1542.
Repealed.
1965, No. 21, § 2, eff. July 1, 1966.

§ 1543.
Preferences in appointment to State positions.

In certification for appointment, in appointment, in employing, in retention of employment position, whether in classified or unclassified civil service, whether for temporary or for extended time, wherever State funds furnish the payroll, preference shall be given to:

ex-service personnel who served on active duty in any branch of the U.S. Armed Forces and have been separated from active duty under honorable conditions and who have established the present existence of a service-connected disability or who are receiving compensation or disability retirement benefits by reason of public laws administered by the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, or the U.S. Department of Defense;

spouses of service-connected disabled ex-service personnel who have themselves been unable to qualify for any civil service appointment by reason of their disability;

unmarried widows or widowers of deceased ex-service personnel who served on active duty in the U.S. Armed Forces during any war, or in any campaign or expedition for which a campaign badge has been authorized, or during the period specified in subdivision (5) of this section and who were separated from active duty under honorable conditions; and

ex-service personnel who served on active duty in the U.S. Armed Forces, during any war, or in any campaign or expedition for which a campaign badge has been authorized, and have been separated from active duty under honorable conditions; and

ex-service personnel who have served on active duty in the U.S. Armed Forces during the period beginning July 1, 1955, and have been separated from the U.S. Armed Forces under honorable conditions.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 268

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 7, 1968;

1987, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2021, No. 20

, § 146.

§ 1544.
State pay for military service.

Each enlisted man and woman in the military or naval forces of the United States subsequent to August 5, 1964 and not later than March 31, 1973, who resided in the State of Vermont at the time of his or her enlistment or induction into the service of the United States shall be entitled to receive from the State, in addition to the pay received from the federal government, the sum of $10.00 for each month not exceeding a total of twelve months served in such forces. Payment may be made upon honorable discharge from service, or upon death in service, or upon honorable separation from active federal service; and in the case of the death of the enlisted man or woman after discharge and prior to the receipt of payment, it shall be paid to his or her spouse, or if there is no spouse living, to the next of kin who are lineal heirs.

In case any enlisted man or woman dies while in service, his or her spouse, or if there is no spouse living, the next of kin who are lineal heirs, shall be entitled to receive from the State the sum of $120.00, except that if any claim is made under this section by a claimant other than a spouse or issue of the deceased, the claim shall not be paid for a period of nine months after the decease of such enlisted man or woman, and payment made by the State after such nine months’ period shall be in and constitute full compliance with this section.

No person shall receive compensation from the State of Vermont under this section if he or she enlisted with the armed services for a period of six months or less for the sole purpose of training.

No person shall receive compensation from the State of Vermont for any service performed subsequent to the date that the President or the Congress of the United States declares that the so-called Vietnam action has ceased.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 24, 1970; amended

1973, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. Feb. 22, 1974.

§ 1545.
Vermont distinguished service medals.

The Governor may present in the name of the State of Vermont a distinguished service medal, ribbon, lapel button, and certificate to an individual or the individual’s spouse, child, parent, sibling, or grandchild if the individual is deceased, provided the individual meets all the following eligibility criteria:

Served on federal active duty in the U.S. Armed Forces in a combat theater of operations during a war or emergency, as evidenced by service during any period of war prior to April 6, 1916; foreign service during World War I or World War II; or receipt of federal decorations showing combat-related service since January 1, 1947.

Received an honorable discharge from federal active duty in the U.S. Armed Forces or died before separating from federal active duty in the U.S. Armed Forces or was declared missing in action by the U.S. Department of Defense; or is currently a member in good standing on federal active duty in the U.S. Armed Forces with more than four years of service.

Is a current resident of Vermont or was a resident of Vermont at the time of entry into military service or was mobilized to federal active duty while a member of the Vermont National Guard or other reserve unit located in Vermont, regardless of the resident’s home of record.

The distinguished service medal shall conform to MIL-DTL-3943 and the State specification sheets; the ribbon shall conform to MIL-DTL-11589 as to quality and construction; and the lapel button shall conform to MIL-DTL-11484. The State specification sheets and original model shall be kept by the Secretary of State.

Application for a distinguished service medal may be made to the Office of Veterans’ Affairs. The Office of Veterans’ Affairs shall also design, cast, and procure the distinguished service medals, and maintain and verify records and documents pertaining to the medals and awards. Approved applicants may choose to receive the medal by mail or in a ceremony with the Governor or a representative of the Governor.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 12c; amended

2005, No. 100

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 23, 2006;

2007, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2021, No. 20

, § 147.

§ 1546.
Vermont veterans’ medal.

The Office of Veterans’ Affairs may present in the name of the State of Vermont a veterans’ medal, ribbon, lapel button, and certificate to an individual or the individual’s spouse, child, parent, sibling, or grandchild if the individual is deceased and the individual meets the following eligibility criteria:

completed a minimum two-year tour of federal active duty in the U.S. Armed Forces, unless discharged for the convenience of the government or retired from a reserve component of the U.S. Armed Forces, and received an honorable discharge, died before separating from federal active duty in the U.S. Armed Forces, or was declared missing in action by the U.S. Department of Defense, or the individual is currently on federal active duty in the U.S. Armed Forces and in good standing with more than four years of service; and

is a current resident of Vermont, a resident of Vermont at the time of entry into military service, or was mobilized to federal active duty while a member of the Vermont National Guard or other reserve unit located in Vermont, regardless of the individual’s home of record.

The veterans’ medal shall conform to MIL-DTL-3943 and the State specification sheets, and shall be as follows: the obverse shall be a relief replica of the coat of arms of the State of Vermont, and shall have the words “Vermont National Defense” in a circular style with “1777” at the bottom and centered. The great seal of Vermont shall be the model for the reverse side. The ribbon shall conform to MIL-DTL-11589 as to quality and construction, and shall consist of the four primary colors of the Vermont coat of arms: green, blue, yellow, and red. The lapel button shall conform to MIL-DTL-11484. The State specification sheets and original model shall be kept by the Secretary of State.

Application for a veterans’ medal will be made to the Office of Veterans’ Affairs. The Office of Veterans’ Affairs shall also design, cast, and procure the veterans’ medals and maintain and verify records and documents pertaining to the medals. Approved applicants may choose to receive the medal by mail or in a ceremony with a representative of the State of Vermont.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 12d; amended

2005, No. 100

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 2, 3, eff. March 23, 2006;

2007, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2021, No. 20

, § 148.

§ 1547.
Patriot’s Medal.

The Governor or designee, at an appropriate time and place, shall present the Vermont Patriot’s Medal and accompanying certificate to the families of Vermont residents killed in action while serving in the armed forces after February 28, 1961.

The medals and certificates, which shall be procured by the Office of Veterans’ Affairs, shall match as closely as possible the original sets of the medal first presented on September 21, 1996.

The Governor or the Governor’s designee, at an appropriate time and place, shall present the Vermont Patriot’s Medal and accompanying certificate to the family of a Vermont resident member or nonresident member of the Vermont National Guard or other reserve unit located in Vermont, who is killed in action while serving in the armed forces after February 28, 1961.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2005, No. 100

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 23, 2006.

§ 1548.
Vermont Veterans’ Fund.

There is created a special fund to be known as the Vermont Veterans’ Fund. This Fund shall be administered by the Military Department and shall be paid out in grants on the recommendations of a nine-member committee comprising:

the Adjutant and Inspector General or designee;

the Vermont Veterans’ Home Administrator or designee;

the Commissioner of Labor or designee;

the Secretary of Human Services or designee;

the Director of the White River Junction VA medical center or designee;

the Director of the White River Junction VA benefits office or designee; and

three members of the Governor’s Veterans’ Council to be appointed by that Council.

The purpose of this Fund shall be to provide grants or other support to individuals and organizations:

for the long-term care of veterans;

to aid homeless veterans;

for transportation services for veterans;

to fund veterans’ service programs; and

to recognize veterans.

The Vermont Veterans’ Fund shall consist of revenues paid into it from the Vermont Veterans’ Fund checkoff established in

32 V.S.A. § 5862e

and from any other source. The Fund shall be managed pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5, and shall be available to the Military Department for the purposes in subsection (b) of this section.

As used in this section, “veteran” means a resident of Vermont who served on active duty in the U.S. Armed Forces or the Vermont National Guard or Vermont Air National Guard and who received an honorable discharge.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 48, eff. June 4, 2010; amended

2013, No. 50

, § E.219.4.